Hawaii, session 2026, SB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-25, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§286-25  Operation of a vehicle or moped without a certificate of inspection.  Whoever operates, permits the operation of, causes to be operated, or parks any vehicle or moped on a public highway without a current official certificate of inspection, issued under section 286-26, shall be fined not more than [$100.]: (1)  $100 for a first offense; and (2)  $200 for a second offense within ten years of a prior offense; provided that the fine shall be not more than $ for any offense where the certificate of inspection is more than two years expired." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________